North Carolina statutes. Chapter 166A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
Article 1A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 166A-19.
Short title.

This Article may be cited as “North Carolina Emergency Management Act.”

History.

1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 120; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.1.
Purposes.

The purposes of this Article are to set forth the authority and responsibility of the Governor, State agencies, and local governments in prevention of, preparation for, response to, and recovery from natural or man-made emergencies or hostile military or paramilitary action and to do the following:

Reduce vulnerability of people and property of this State to damage, injury, and loss of life and property.

Prepare for prompt and efficient rescue, care, and treatment of threatened or affected persons.

Provide for the rapid and orderly rehabilitation of persons and restoration of property.

Provide for cooperation and coordination of activities relating to emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery among agencies and officials of this State and with similar agencies and officials of other states, with local and federal governments, with interstate organizations, and with other private and quasi-official organizations.

History.

1959, c. 337, s. 1; 1975, c. 734, s. 1; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 121; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.2.
Limitations.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed to do any of the following:

Interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs; but any communications facility or organization, including, but not limited to, radio and television stations, wire services, and newspapers may be requested to transmit or print public service messages furnishing information or instructions in connection with an emergency, disaster, or war.

Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the Governor to declare martial law or exercise any other powers vested in the Governor under the North Carolina Constitution, statutes, or common law of this State independent of, or in conjunction with, any provisions of this Article.

History.

1975, c. 734, s. 2; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 122; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.3.
Definitions. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 6.19(c), effective July 1, 2015.

Chair of the board of county commissioners. — The chair of the board of county commissioners or, in case of the chair’s absence or disability, the person authorized to act in the chair’s stead. Unless the governing body of the county has specified who is to act in lieu of the chair with respect to a particular power or duty set out in this Article, this term shall mean the person generally authorized to act in lieu of the chair.

Disaster declaration. — A gubernatorial declaration that the impact or anticipated impact of an emergency constitutes a disaster of one of the types enumerated in G.S. 166A-19.21(b).

Division. — The Division of Emergency Management established in Subpart A of Part 5 of Article 13 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.

Eligible entity. — Any political subdivision. The term also includes an owner or operator of a private nonprofit utility that meets the eligibility criteria set out in this Article.

Emergency. — An occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any natural or man-made accidental, military, paramilitary, terrorism, weather-related, public health, explosion-related, riot-related cause, or technological failure or accident, including, but not limited to, a cyber incident, an explosion, a transportation accident, a radiological accident, or a chemical or other hazardous material incident.

Emergency area. — The geographical area covered by a state of emergency.

Emergency management. — Those measures taken by the populace and governments at federal, State, and local levels to minimize the adverse effect of any type emergency, which includes the never-ending preparedness cycle of planning, prevention, mitigation, warning, movement, shelter, emergency assistance, and recovery.

Emergency management agency. — A State or local governmental agency charged with coordination of all emergency management activities for its jurisdiction.

Hazard risk management. — The systematic application of policies, practices, and resources to the identification, assessment, and control of risk associated with hazards affecting human health and safety and property. Hazard, risk, and cost-benefit analysis are used to support development of risk reduction options, program objectives, and prioritization of issues and resources.

Mayor. — The mayor or other chief executive official of a municipality or, in case of that person’s absence or disability, the person authorized to act in that person’s stead. Unless the governing body of the municipality has specified who is to act in lieu of the mayor with respect to a particular power or duty set out in this Article, the term shall mean the person generally authorized to act in lieu of the mayor.

Political subdivision. — Counties and incorporated cities, towns, and villages.

Preliminary damage assessment. — The initial estimate prepared by State, local, or federal emergency management workers used to determine the severity and magnitude of damage caused by an emergency.

Private nonprofit utility. — A utility that would be eligible for federal public assistance disaster funds pursuant to 44 C.F.R. Part 206.

Secretary. — The Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

Stafford Act. — The Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, Pub. L. No. 93-288, 88 Stat. 143, codified generally at 42 U.S.C. § 5121, et seq., as amended.

State Acquisition and Relocation Fund. — State funding for supplemental grants to homeowners participating in a federal Hazard Mitigation Grant Program Acquisition and Relocation Program. These grants are used to acquire safe, decent, and sanitary housing by paying the difference between the cost of the home acquired under the federal Hazard Mitigation Grant Program Acquisition and Relocation Program and the cost of a comparable home located outside the 100-year floodplain.

(17a)

State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund. — The fund established in

G.S. 166A-19.42

.

State Emergency Response Team. — The representative group of State agency personnel designated to carry out the emergency management support functions identified in the North Carolina Emergency Operations Plan. The State Emergency Response Team leader shall be the Director of the Division, who shall have authority to manage the Team pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.12(1)

, as delegated by the Governor. The Team shall consist of the following State agencies:

Department of Public Safety.

Department of Transportation.

Department of Health and Human Services.

Department of Environmental Quality.

Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Any other agency identified in the North Carolina Emergency Operations Plan.

State of emergency. — A finding and declaration by any of the following authorities that an emergency exists:

The Governor, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.20

.

The General Assembly, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.20

.

The governing body of a municipality or the mayor of a municipality, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.22

.

The governing body of a county or the chair of the board of commissioners of a county, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.22

.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 2; 1953, c. 1099, s. 1; 1955, c. 387, s. 1; 1975, c. 734, ss. 4-6, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 123; 2001-214, s. 1; 2006-66, ss. 6.5(c), (d); 2009-193, ss. 1, 2; 2009-397, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2012-90, s. 10; 2015-241, ss. 6.19(c), 14.30(u); 2016-87, s. 5.

§ 166A-19.3.
Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 6.19(c), effective July 1, 2015.

Chair of the board of county commissioners. — The chair of the board of county commissioners or, in case of the chair’s absence or disability, the person authorized to act in the chair’s stead. Unless the governing body of the county has specified who is to act in lieu of the chair with respect to a particular power or duty set out in this Article, this term shall mean the person generally authorized to act in lieu of the chair.

(2d)

(Effective January 1, 2023)

Concurrence of the Council of State. – The consensus, within 48 hours of contact, of a majority of the Council of State prior to the Governor exercising a power or authority requiring a concurrence of the Council of State. The Governor shall document the contact and response of each Council of State member and shall release the concurrence, nonconcurrence, or no response provided by each member by name and position on the same website in which the executive order is published. If consensus is achieved, the release of the information by the Governor shall be prior to, or simultaneously with, exercising the stated authority. Any failure to respond to the Governor within the 48 hours of contact shall be deemed a concurrence by the member of the Council of State failing to respond. All documentation of the contact and response of each member of the Council of State shall be a public record.

(2m)

(Effective January 1, 2023)

Council of State. – The Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Superintendent of Public Instruction, Attorney General, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, Commissioner of Insurance, or any interim officer or acting officer appointed in accordance with Section 7 of Article III of the State Constitution.

Disaster declaration. — A gubernatorial declaration that the impact or anticipated impact of an emergency constitutes a disaster of one of the types enumerated in G.S. 166A-19.21(b).

Division. — The Division of Emergency Management established in Subpart A of Part 5 of Article 13 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.

Eligible entity. — Any political subdivision. The term also includes an owner or operator of a private nonprofit utility that meets the eligibility criteria set out in this Article.

Emergency. — An occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any natural or man-made accidental, military, paramilitary, terrorism, weather-related, public health, explosion-related, riot-related cause, or technological failure or accident, including, but not limited to, a cyber incident, an explosion, a transportation accident, a radiological accident, or a chemical or other hazardous material incident.

Emergency area. — The geographical area covered by a state of emergency.

Emergency management. — Those measures taken by the populace and governments at federal, State, and local levels to minimize the adverse effect of any type emergency, which includes the never-ending preparedness cycle of planning, prevention, mitigation, warning, movement, shelter, emergency assistance, and recovery.

Emergency management agency. — A State or local governmental agency charged with coordination of all emergency management activities for its jurisdiction.

Hazard risk management. — The systematic application of policies, practices, and resources to the identification, assessment, and control of risk associated with hazards affecting human health and safety and property. Hazard, risk, and cost-benefit analysis are used to support development of risk reduction options, program objectives, and prioritization of issues and resources.

Mayor. — The mayor or other chief executive official of a municipality or, in case of that person’s absence or disability, the person authorized to act in that person’s stead. Unless the governing body of the municipality has specified who is to act in lieu of the mayor with respect to a particular power or duty set out in this Article, the term shall mean the person generally authorized to act in lieu of the mayor.

Political subdivision. — Counties and incorporated cities, towns, and villages.

Preliminary damage assessment. — The initial estimate prepared by State, local, or federal emergency management workers used to determine the severity and magnitude of damage caused by an emergency.

Private nonprofit utility. — A utility that would be eligible for federal public assistance disaster funds pursuant to 44 C.F.R. Part 206.

Secretary. — The Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

Stafford Act. — The Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, Pub. L. No. 93-288, 88 Stat. 143, codified generally at 42 U.S.C. § 5121, et seq., as amended.

State Acquisition and Relocation Fund. — State funding for supplemental grants to homeowners participating in a federal Hazard Mitigation Grant Program Acquisition and Relocation Program. These grants are used to acquire safe, decent, and sanitary housing by paying the difference between the cost of the home acquired under the federal Hazard Mitigation Grant Program Acquisition and Relocation Program and the cost of a comparable home located outside the 100-year floodplain.

(17a)

State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund. — The fund established in

G.S. 166A-19.42

.

State Emergency Response Team. — The representative group of State agency personnel designated to carry out the emergency management support functions identified in the North Carolina Emergency Operations Plan. The State Emergency Response Team leader shall be the Director of the Division, who shall have authority to manage the Team pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.12(1)

, as delegated by the Governor. The Team shall consist of the following State agencies:

Department of Public Safety.

Department of Transportation.

Department of Health and Human Services.

Department of Environmental Quality.

Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Any other agency identified in the North Carolina Emergency Operations Plan.

State of emergency. — A finding and declaration by any of the following authorities that an emergency exists:

The Governor, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.20

.

The General Assembly, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.20

.

The governing body of a municipality or the mayor of a municipality, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.22

.

The governing body of a county or the chair of the board of commissioners of a county, acting under the authority of

G.S. 166A-19.22

.

(Effective January 1, 2023) Statewide emergency area. – Any emergency area applicable to two-thirds or more of the counties in this State.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 2; 1953, c. 1099, s. 1; 1955, c. 387, s. 1; 1975, c. 734, ss. 4-6, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 123; 2001-214, s. 1; 2006-66, ss. 6.5(c), (d); 2009-193, ss. 1, 2; 2009-397, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2012-90, s. 10; 2015-241, ss. 6.19(c), 14.30(u); 2016-87, s. 5; 2021-180, s. 19E.6(a).

§§ 166A-19.4 through 166A-19.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. State Emergency Management.

§ 166A-19.10.
Powers of the Governor.

State Emergency Management Program. — The State Emergency Management Program includes all aspects of preparations for, response to, recovery from, and mitigation against war or peacetime emergencies.

Powers of the Governor. — The Governor is authorized and empowered to do the following:

To exercise general direction and control of the State Emergency Management Program and to be responsible for carrying out the provisions of this Article, other than those provisions that confer powers and duties exclusively on local governments.

To make, amend, or rescind the necessary orders, rules, and regulations within the limits of the authority conferred upon the Governor herein, with due consideration of the policies of the federal government.

To delegate any authority vested in the Governor under this Article and to provide for the subdelegation of any such authority.

To cooperate and coordinate with the President and the heads of the departments and agencies of the federal government, and with other appropriate federal officers and agencies, and with the officers and agencies of other states and local units of government in matters pertaining to the emergency management of the State and nation.

To enter into agreements with the American National Red Cross, Salvation Army, Mennonite Disaster Service, and other disaster relief organizations.

To make, amend, or rescind mutual aid agreements in accordance with

G.S. 166A-19.72

.

To utilize the services, equipment, supplies, and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the State and of the political subdivisions thereof. The officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies are required to cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the Governor upon request. This authority shall extend to a state of emergency declared pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.20

, to the imminent threat of an emergency that will likely require an emergency to be declared pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.20

, or to emergency management planning and training purposes.

To agree, when required to obtain federal assistance in debris removal, that the State will indemnify the federal government against any claim arising from the removal of the debris.

To sell, lend, lease, give, transfer, or deliver materials or perform services for emergency purposes on such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by any existing law, and to account to the State Treasurer for any funds received for such property.

In an emergency, or when requested by the governing body of a political subdivision in the State, to assume operational control over all or any part of the emergency management functions within this State.

History.

1951, c. 1016, ss. 3, 9; 1953, c. 1099, s. 3; 1955, c. 387, ss. 2, 3, 5; 1957, c. 950, s. 5; 1975, c. 734, ss. 9, 10, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 124; 2001-214, s. 2; 2002-179, s. 12; 2009-192, s. 1; 2009-193, s. 3; 2009-196, s. 1; 2009-225, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.11.
Powers of the Secretary of Public Safety.

The Secretary shall be responsible to the Governor for State emergency management activities. The Secretary shall have the following powers and duties as delegated by the Governor:

To activate the State and local plans applicable to the areas in question and to authorize and direct the deployment and use of any personnel and forces to which the plan or plans apply, and the use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, materials, and facilities available pursuant to this Article or any other provision of law.

To adopt the rules to implement those provisions of this Article that deal with matters other than those that are exclusively local.

To develop a system to produce a preliminary damage assessment from which the Secretary will recommend the appropriate level of disaster declaration to the Governor. The system shall, at a minimum, consider whether the damage involved and its effects are of such a severity and magnitude as to be beyond the response capabilities of the local government or political subdivision.

(3a)

To notify the Director of the Budget, the Office of the Governor, the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees, the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety, the Fiscal Research Division, and any other State entities deemed necessary of the potential for using Community Development Block Grant-Disaster Recovery (CDBG-DR) funds to cover the nonfederal share of matching requirements for eligible programs at the following times:

June 1 of each year.

Within five days of a presidential disaster declaration for the State of North Carolina.

(3b)

To report annually by December 1 to the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety on the amount of State funds used to pay contractors for performing CDBG-DR activities that could have been paid for using federal CDBG-DR funds during the calendar year.

Additional authority, duties, and responsibilities as may be prescribed by the Governor. The Secretary may subdelegate his authority to the appropriate member of the Secretary’s department.

History.

1951, c. 1016, ss. 3, 9; 1953, c. 1099, s. 3; 1955, c. 387, ss. 2, 3, 5; 1957, c. 950, s. 5; 1975, c. 734, ss. 9, 10, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 124; 2001-214, s. 2; 2002-179, s. 12; 2009-192, s. 1; 2009-193, s. 3; 2009-196, s. 1; 2009-225, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2019-250, s. 3.5(a).

§ 166A-19.12.
Powers of the Division of Emergency Management.

The Division of Emergency Management shall have the following powers and duties as delegated by the Governor and Secretary of Public Safety:

Coordination of the activities of all State agencies for emergency management within the State, including planning, organizing, staffing, equipping, training, testing, and activating and managing the State Emergency Response Team and emergency management programs.

Preparation and maintenance of State plans for emergencies. The State plans or any parts thereof may be incorporated into department regulations and into executive orders of the Governor.

Coordination with the State Health Director to amend or revise the North Carolina Emergency Operations Plan regarding public health matters. At a minimum, the revisions to the Plan shall provide for the following:

The epidemiologic investigation of a known or suspected threat caused by nuclear, biological, or chemical agents.

The examination and testing of persons and animals that may have been exposed to a nuclear, biological, or chemical agent.

The procurement and allocation of immunizing agents and prophylactic antibiotics.

The allocation of the Strategic National Stockpile.

The appropriate conditions for quarantine and isolation in order to prevent further transmission of disease.

Immunization procedures.

The issuance of guidelines for prophylaxis and treatment of exposed and affected persons.

Establishment of a voluntary model registry for use by political subdivisions in identifying functionally and medically fragile persons in need of assistance during an emergency. All records, data, information, correspondence, and communications relating to the registration of persons with special needs or of functionally and medically fragile persons obtained pursuant to this subdivision are confidential and are not a public record pursuant to

G.S. 132-1

or any other applicable statute, except that this information shall be available to emergency response agencies, as determined by the local emergency management director. This information shall be used only for the purposes set forth in this subdivision.

Promulgation of standards and requirements for local plans and programs consistent with federal and State laws and regulations, determination of eligibility for State financial assistance provided for in

G.S. 166A-19.15

, and provision of technical assistance to local governments. Standards and requirements for local plans and programs promulgated under this subdivision shall be reviewed by the Division at least biennially and updated as necessary.

Development and presentation of training programs, including the Emergency Management Certification Program established under Article 5 of this Chapter, and public information programs to insure the furnishing of adequately trained personnel and an informed public in time of need.

Making of such studies and surveys of the resources in this State as may be necessary to ascertain the capabilities of the State for emergency management, maintaining data on these resources, and planning for the most efficient use thereof.

Coordination of the use of any private facilities, services, and property.

Preparation for issuance by the Governor of executive orders, declarations, and regulations as necessary or appropriate.

Cooperation and maintenance of liaison with the other states, the federal government, and any public or private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this Article and in implementing programs for emergency or war prevention, preparation, response, and recovery.

Making recommendations, as appropriate, for zoning, building, and other land-use controls, and safety measures for securing mobile homes or other nonpermanent or semipermanent works designed to protect against or mitigate the effects of an emergency.

Coordination of the use of existing means of communications and supplementing communications resources and integrating them into a comprehensive State or State-federal telecommunications or other communications system or network.

Administration of federal and State grant funds provided for emergency management purposes, including those funds provided for planning and preparedness activities by emergency management agencies.

Serving as the lead State agency for the coordination of information and resources for hazard risk management, which shall include the following responsibilities:

Coordinating with other State agencies and county governments in conducting hazard risk analysis. To the extent another State agency has primary responsibility for the adoption of hazard mitigation standards, those standards shall be applied in conducting a hazard risk analysis.

Establishing and maintaining a hazard risk management information system and tools to display natural hazards and vulnerabilities and conducting risk assessment.

Acquiring and leveraging all natural hazard data generated or maintained by State agencies and county governments.

Acquiring and leveraging all vulnerability data generated or maintained by State agencies and county governments.

Maintaining a clearinghouse for methodologies and metrics for calculating and communicating hazard probability and loss estimation.

Utilizing and maintaining technology that enables efficient and effective communication and management of resources between political subdivisions, State agencies, and other governmental entities involved in emergency management activities.

Establishing and operating a 24-hour Operations Center to serve as a single point of contact for local governments to report the occurrence of emergency and disaster events and to coordinate local and State response assets. The Division shall record all telephone calls to the 24-hour Operations Center emergency hotline and shall maintain the recording of each telephone call for at least one year.

Developing, maintaining, and implementing plans for response to any emergency occurring at a fixed nuclear power generating facility located in or near the borders of the State of North Carolina.

Maintaining the State Emergency Operations Center as the facility to house the State Emergency Response Team whenever it is activated for disaster response.

Serving as the agency responsible for the management of intrastate and interstate mutual aid planning, implementation, and resource procurement necessary for supporting emergency response and recovery.

Coordination with the Commissioner of Agriculture, or the Commissioner’s designee, to amend or revise the North Carolina Emergency Operations Plan regarding agricultural matters. At a minimum, the revisions to the Plan shall provide for the following:

The examination and testing of animals that may have been exposed to a nuclear, biological, or chemical agent.

The appropriate conditions for quarantine and isolation of animals in order to prevent further transmission of disease.

Maintenance of an effective statewide urban search and rescue program.

Serving as the lead State agency for the implementation and maintenance of the statewide School Risk and Response Management System (SRRMS) under

G.S. 115C-105.49

A.

Coordination with the State Chief Information Officer and the Adjutant General to manage statewide response to cybersecurity incidents and significant cybersecurity incidents as defined by

G.S. 143B-1320

. This includes, but is not limited to:

Development and promulgation of necessary policies, plans, and procedures for cybersecurity and critical infrastructure protection; and

Annual review, update, and testing of cybersecurity incident response plans and procedures.

The Division may contract for services from vendors specializing in housing, rehabilitation, or construction on private residential structures funded by State or federal funds provided to the State as a result of a disaster declared by the President under the Stafford Act or a disaster declared by the Governor under

G.S. 166A-19.21

. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to exempt the Division from other requirements of Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

The Division may contract for services from vendors specializing in housing elevation, acquisition, demolition, and mitigation reconstruction on private residential structures to implement the federal Hazard Mitigation Grant Program on behalf of the State or political subdivisions. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to exempt the Division from other requirements of Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

History.

1951, c. 1016, ss. 3, 9; 1953, c. 1099, s. 3; 1955, c. 387, ss. 2, 3, 5; 1957, c. 950, s. 5; 1975, c. 734, ss. 9, 10, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 124; 2001-214, s. 2; 2002-179, s. 12; 2009-192, s. 1; 2009-193, s. 3; 2009-196, s. 1; 2009-225, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2012-90, ss. 11, 12; 2014-27, s. 3; 2014-122, s. 6(c); 2015-241, s. 8.26(j); 2019-200, s. 6(b); 2021-180, s. 5.9(q).

§ 166A-19.13.
Data collection, reporting, use of State and federal funds.

The Department of Public Safety shall establish mechanisms to regularly solicit input from entities receiving federal or State disaster recovery funds regarding ways to improve the administration of the funds and associated programs. The mechanisms may include surveys and focus groups.

By December 1, 2020, the Department of Public Safety shall modify its policies and procedures for disaster recovery to do the following:

Where permitted by State law and administrative rule, require the Office of Recovery and Resiliency (Office) to use cost as a factor when awarding contracts for professional services that may be eligible for reimbursement from federal funds. Contracts subject to Article 3D of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes are exempt from this subsection.

Establish minimum competencies for staff who administer the Community Development Block Grant-Disaster Recovery (CDBG-DR) program, including experience with either traditional CDBG programs or CDBG-DR programs.

Describe how the input obtained from the mechanisms established in subsection (a) of this section will be incorporated into revisions of its policies and procedures.

By January 1, 2020, the Office of Recovery and Resiliency (Office) shall develop performance metrics for all entities receiving federal or State disaster recovery funds, including the following:

Total number of projects managed overall.

Outreach and intake metrics.

Amount of disaster recovery funds spent on administrative activities.

Amount of disaster recovery funds disbursed on behalf of recipients.

History.

2019-250, s. 3.5(b).

§ 166A-19.14.
Priority consideration of North Carolina-based companies when addressing public health emergencies.

During a public health emergency, the Department of Health and Human Services and the North Carolina Division of Emergency Management within the Department of Public Safety shall first consider North Carolina-based companies that can provide mobile response units with capabilities to reach rural areas of the State. Operations that shall be considered include patient testing or sample collections, feeding operations, triage facilities, and other operations where it is necessary to deliver mobile services to individuals.

History.

2020-3, s. 3C.2(a).

§ 166A-19.15.
County and municipal emergency management.

Governing Body of Counties Responsible for Emergency Management. — The governing body of each county is responsible for emergency management within the geographical limits of such county. All emergency management efforts within the county will be coordinated by the county, including activities of the municipalities within the county.

Counties May Establish and Maintain Emergency Management Agencies. — The governing body of each county is hereby authorized to establish and maintain an emergency management agency for the purposes contained in

G.S. 166A-19.1

. The governing body of each county which establishes an emergency management agency pursuant to this authorization shall appoint a coordinator who will have a direct responsibility for the organization, administration, and operation of the county program and will be subject to the direction and guidance of such governing body. In the event that any county fails to establish an emergency management agency, and the Governor, in the Governor’s discretion, determines that a need exists for such an emergency management agency, then the Governor is hereby empowered to establish an emergency management agency within that county.

Municipalities May Establish and Maintain Emergency Management Agencies. — All incorporated municipalities are authorized to establish and maintain emergency management agencies subject to coordination by the county.

Joint Agencies Authorized. — Counties and incorporated municipalities are authorized to form joint emergency management agencies composed of a county and one or more municipalities within the county’s borders, between two or more counties, or between two or more counties and one or more municipalities within the borders of those counties.

Local Appropriations Authorized. — Each county and incorporated municipality in this State is authorized to make appropriations for the purposes of this Article and to fund them by levy of property taxes pursuant to

G.S. 153A-149

and

G.S. 160A-209

and by the allocation of other revenues, use of which is not otherwise restricted by law.

Additional Powers. — In carrying out the provisions of this Article each political subdivision is authorized to do the following:

To appropriate and expend funds, make contracts, obtain and distribute equipment, materials, and supplies for emergency management purposes and to provide for the health and safety of persons and property, including emergency assistance, consistent with this Article.

(1a)

To award contracts for the repair, rehabilitation, or construction of private residential structures funded by State or federal funds provided to the political subdivision as a result of a disaster declared by the Governor under

G.S. 166A-19.21

covering the political subdivision. For purposes of contracts awarded under this subdivision for a particular disaster, a political subdivision is authorized to contract with contractors prequalified by the Division in accordance with

G.S. 143-135.8

for that disaster. In so contracting, the political subdivision is not required to follow the procedures for prequalifying contractors set forth in

G.S. 143-135.8

. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to exempt a political subdivision from other requirements of Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

To direct and coordinate the development of emergency management plans and programs in accordance with the policies and standards set by the Division, consistent with federal and State laws and regulations.

To assign and make available all available resources for emergency management purposes for service within or outside of the physical limits of the subdivision.

To delegate powers in a local state of emergency declared pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.22

.

To coordinate the voluntary registration of functionally and medically fragile persons in need of assistance during an emergency either through a registry established by this subdivision or by the State. All records, data, information, correspondence, and communications relating to the registration of persons with special needs or of functionally and medically fragile persons obtained pursuant to this subdivision are confidential and are not a public record pursuant to

G.S. 132-1

or any other applicable statute, except that this information shall be available to emergency response agencies, as determined by the local emergency management director. This information shall be used only for the purposes set forth in this subdivision.

County Eligibility for State and Federal Financial Assistance. — Each county which establishes an emergency management agency pursuant to State standards and which meets requirements for local plans and programs may be eligible to receive State and federal financial assistance, including State and federal funding appropriated for emergency management planning and preparedness, and for the maintenance and operation of a county emergency management program. Such financial assistance is subject to an appropriation being made for this purpose. Where the appropriation does not allocate appropriated funds among counties, the amount allocated to each county shall be determined annually by the Division. The size of this allocation shall be based in part on the degree to which local plans and programs meet State standards and requirements promulgated by the Division, including those relating to professional competencies of local emergency management personnel. However, in making an allocation determination, the Division shall, where appropriate, take into account the fact that a particular county may lack sufficient resources to meet the standards and requirements promulgated by the Division.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 6; 1953, c. 1099, s. 4; 1957, c. 950, s. 2; 1959, c. 337, s. 5; 1973, c. 620, s. 9; 1975, c. 734, ss. 12, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, ss. 126, 127; 2009-196, s. 2; 2009-225, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2019-250, s. 3.2.

§§ 166A-19.16 through 166A-19.19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Declarations of State of Emergency.